Maine, session 132, LD1529.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §685-C, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 676, Pt. A, §§23
and 24, is further amended to read:
1. Comprehensive land use plan. The commission shall prepare an official
comprehensive land use plan, referred to in this subsection as "the plan," for the
unorganized and deorganized areas of the State.
The commission must use the plan as a guide in developing specific land use standards and
delineating district boundaries and guiding development and generally fulfilling the
purposes of this chapter.
The plan may consist of maps, data and statements of present and prospective resource uses
that generally delineate the proper use of resources, and recommendations for its
implementation.
The commission shall hold public hearings to collect information to be used in establishing
the plan. The public hearings must be conducted according to commission rules adopted in
accordance with procedures for the establishment of rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2.
The commission may, on its own motion or petition of any state agency or regional
planning commission, hold such other hearings as the commission considers necessary
from time to time for the purpose of obtaining information helpful in the determination of
its policies, the carrying out of its duties or the formulation of its land use standards or
rules.
A. The commission may not finalize a plan or a portion of a plan without:
(1) Submitting a draft copy of the tentative plan to each regional planning
commission and other appropriate planning or state resource agencies, which shall
forward their comments and recommendations, if any, to the commission within
30 days;
Page 1 - 132LR1424(06)

(2) Submitting a draft copy of the tentative plan to the Director of the Bureau of
Resource Information and Land Use Planning within the Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, Bureau of Resource Information and Land
Use Planning, as described in Title 7‑A, section 206, subsection 4, or its the
director's successor, which who shall forward its the director's comments and
recommendations, if any, to the commission within 30 days; and
(3) Considering all comments and recommendations submitted under paragraphs
A and B‑1; and subparagraphs (1) and (2).
(4) Submitting the tentative plan to the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over conservation matters and the committee reviewing the
plan at a public meeting. The commission shall brief the committee on any
anticipated changes to land use districts and subdistricts based on revisions in the
comprehensive land use plan and a projected timetable for rulemaking to adopt
these changes.
B-1. After the commission has finalized provisionally adopted a plan or a portion of a
plan, but prior to final adoption, the commission shall provide a copy to the
Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, who shall submit the
finalized provisionally adopted plan or a portion of the plan to the Governor for
comments. The commissioner shall submit the finalized provisionally adopted plan or
a portion of the plan, including the Governor's comments, to the Legislature within 30
days after the convening of for approval during the next regular legislative session for
approval. The Legislature shall, by act or resolve, approve, disapprove or require
changes to the provisionally adopted plan or any portion of the plan prior to
adjournment. If the provisionally adopted plan or a portion of the plan is approved or
the Legislature fails to act on the provisionally adopted plan or a portion of the plan
before adjournment, the provisionally adopted plan or a portion of the plan may be
finally adopted by the commission. If the provisionally adopted plan or a portion of
the plan is disapproved or revisions are required, the provisionally adopted plan or a
portion of the plan must be revised by the commission and resubmitted to the
Legislature for approval by act or resolve. The joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over conservation matters may submit legislation to
implement the provisions of this paragraph.
This subsection also applies to any material alteration in the plan.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §8879, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Report on conservation of late-successional forests and old-growth forests.
Beginning with the report due on January 1, 2031, the report must include information
regarding the status of late-successional forests and old-growth forests in the State and
actions that have been taken since the previous report under this section to enhance the
conservation of late-successional forests and old-growth forests on public and private land
statewide.
Sec. 3. Maine Land Use Planning Commission; comprehensive land use
plan. The Maine Land Use Planning Commission, referred to in this section as "the
commission," shall, as part of the next update to the comprehensive land use plan under the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 12, section 685-C, subsection 1, consider the effectiveness
of its lake management program and whether changing circumstances and new trends
Page 2 - 132LR1424(06)

warrant an update to the program, including an evaluation as to whether all lakes or a subset
of lakes should be reclassified, what methods should be used to revise lake classifications
if needed, the cost of the reclassifications, possible funding sources and the priority for
implementation. The evaluation must consider whether additional measures are required
to protect the character and natural resource values of the commission's current
Management Class 7 lakes that are undeveloped and have one or more natural resources
classified as outstanding by the Department of Conservation, Land Use Regulation
Commission's Maine Wildlands Lake Assessment published in 1987 in accordance with
the commission's goal of maintaining an appropriate balance between conservation and
development.
Sec. 4. Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to develop
comprehensive report on statewide strategies to enhance conservation of late-
successional forests and old-growth forests. Subject to the availability of funds, the
Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry, referred to in this section as "the
department," may develop a comprehensive report on statewide strategies to enhance the
conservation of late-successional forests and old-growth forests, including the management
of transitioning late-successional forests. In developing the strategies, the department may
incorporate ecological values, carbon sequestration methods and economic considerations
from a broad range of perspectives to include forest landowners, forest industry
representatives, logging contractors, conservation interests and local economies. By
November 4, 2026, the department may submit the report, including any recommendations,
to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over agriculture,
conservation and forestry matters, which may report out legislation related to the report to
the 133rd Legislature in 2027. In completing the report under this section, the department
may solicit and use resources from other state agencies and outside sources.
Page 3 - 132LR1424(06)